Utah statutes.
53A-1-303.   Advice by superintendent -- Written opinions.

(1)  The state superintendent shall advise superintendents, school boards, and other school officers upon all matters involving the welfare of the schools.

(2)  The superintendent shall, when requested by district superintendents or other school officers, provide written opinions on questions of public education, administrative policy, and procedure, but not upon questions of law.

(3)  Upon request by the state superintendent, the attorney general shall issue written opinions on questions of law.

(4)  Opinions issued under this section shall be considered to be correct and final unless set aside by a court of competent jurisdiction or by subsequent legislation.

